Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB208.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6111(a)(1), (b)(1.1)(v) and (f)(2) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 6111. Sale or transfer of firearms.(a) Time and manner of delivery.--(1) [Except as provided in paragraph (2), no seller shall deliver a firearm to the purchaser or transferee thereof until 48 hours shall have elapsed from the time of the application for the purchase thereof, and, when delivered, the firearm shall be securely wrapped and shall be unloaded.] A seller, licensed importer, licensed dealer, licensed manufacturer or county sheriff facilitating a transfer of a firearm between two persons, who are not 123456789101112131415161718 licensed importers, licensed dealers or licensed manufacturers, may not deliver the firearm to the purchaser or transferee until a period of 72 hours has elapsed from the time of the purchase. This paragraph shall not apply to a transfer between spouses, a parent and child or a grandparent and grandchild who is otherwise eligible to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer a firearm under section 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms).* * *(b) Duty of seller.--No licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer shall sell or deliver any firearm to another person, other than a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, licensed dealer or licensed collector, until the conditions of subsection (a) have been satisfied and until he has:* * *(1.1) On the date of publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin of a notice by the Pennsylvania State Police that the instantaneous records check has been implemented, all of the following shall apply:* * *(v) Unless it has been discovered pursuant to a criminal history, juvenile delinquency and mental health records background check that the potential purchaser or transferee is prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to section 6105 [(relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms)], no information on the application/record of sale provided pursuant to this subsection shall be 20250SB0208PN0155 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 retained as precluded by section 6111.4 (relating to registration of firearms) by the Pennsylvania State Police either through retention of the application/record of sale or by entering the information onto a computer, and, further, an application/record of sale received by the Pennsylvania State Police pursuant to this subsection shall be destroyed within 72 hours of the completion of the criminal history, juvenile delinquency and mental health records background check.* * *(f) Application of section.--* * *[(2) The provisions contained in subsections (a) and (c) shall only apply to pistols or revolvers with a barrel length of less than 15 inches, any shotgun with a barrel length of less than 18 inches, any rifle with a barrel length of less than 16 inches or any firearm with an overall length of less than 26 inches.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0208PN0155 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920